Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Penalties

45.990.
Penalties.

Any officer, agent, or employee of any budget unit who willfully fails or refuses to comply with any of the provisions of KRS

45.011

to

45.031

,

45.121

,

45.142

,

45.151

,

45.242

,

45.244

,

45.251

,

45.253

,

45.305

, or

45.313

, or who expends any money in violation of any of the provisions of those sections, shall be subject to prosecution in the Franklin Circuit Court, and upon conviction shall be guilty of a violation.

If any person incurs, or orders or votes for the incurrence of, any obligations in violation of any of the provisions of KRS

45.244

, he and his sureties shall be jointly and severally liable therefor.

Any employee of the Office of Material and Procurement Services established within the Office of the Controller, or any official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, elective or appointive, who shall take, receive, or offer to take or receive, either directly or indirectly, any rebate, percentage of contract, money, or other things of value, as an inducement or intended inducement in the procurement of business, or the giving of business, including, but not limited to, personal service contracts, for, or to, or from, any person, partnership, firm, or corporation, offering, bidding for, or in open market seeking to make sales to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall be deemed guilty of a Class C felony.

Every person, firm, or corporation offering to make, or pay, or give, any rebate, percentage of contract, money, or any other thing of value, as an inducement or intended inducement, in the procurement of business, or the giving of business, including, but not limited to, personal service contracts, to any employee of the Office of Material and Procurement Services or to any official of the Commonwealth, elective or appointive, in his efforts to bid for, or offer for sale, or to seek in the open market, shall be deemed guilty of a Class C felony.

History.

1992b-31, 1992b-63; Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 54; repealed and reenact., 1968, ch. 152, § 20; 1978, ch. 110, § 98, effective January 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 40, § 3 (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), effective March 12, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 39, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 365, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 496, § 23, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 5, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 68, effective June 20, 2005.

45.991.
Penalties.

Any officer, agent, or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet who willfully fails or refuses to comply with any of the provisions of KRS

45.131

is subject to indictment in the Franklin Circuit Court and, upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History.

1992b-63, 3990-22; Acts 1942, ch. 122, §§
1–4; 1954, ch. 187, §
5; 1964, ch. 16, §
8; 1964, ch. 178, §
2; 1966, ch. 126, §
2, 1966 ch. 255, §
283; repealed and reenact., Acts 1968, ch. 152, §
18; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, §
9(1); repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 111, § 36, effective July 13, 1984.